Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ONECOMMUNITY ALLIANCE.new text end new text begin $600,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to OneCommunity Alliance to assist individuals seeking careers with local businesses in Central Minnesota within the manufacturing, food production, agriculture, and health care sectors. OneCommunity Alliance, through the nonprofit's employment and economy action committee, must launch a program in 2025 to equip job seekers in central Minnesota with the knowledge and skills they need to successfully secure employment. OneCommunity Alliance shall provide the following services with the money appropriated: workforce training, career readiness training, job placement assistance, and ongoing support. OneCommunity Alliance must focus program participation to primarily unemployed and underemployed people, recent graduates struggling to find work, and those looking to transition into new career fields. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end